California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) Effective July 1, 1976, all insurers, and their employees and agents, shall, when presenting any disability insurance policy for examination or sale to an individual prospective insured or individual prospective subscriber, provide such individual with a properly completed disclosure form, as prescribed by the commissioner pursuant to Sections 10603 and 10604, for each disability insurance policy so examined or sold.

(b) In the case of group disability insurance contracts, the completed disclosure form shall be presented to the contract holder upon delivery of the group policy or contract.

(c) Group insurance contract holders shall disseminate copies of the completed disclosure form to all persons or family units eligible under the group contract. Where the individual members of the group are offered a choice of policies, separate disclosure forms shall be supplied for each policy available.

(d) Disability insurance issued in connection with an employees’ welfare plan subject to the Federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406) is exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1208.)
-------------------------------------------

10606.

Effective July 1, 1976, where the commissioner finds it necessary in the interest of full and fair disclosure, all advertising and other consumer information, including brochures, disseminated by insurers for the purpose of influencing persons to purchase health insurance shall contain such supplemental disclosure information as the commissioner may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1208.)
-------------------------------------------

10607.

In addition to the other disclosures required by this chapter, every insurer and their employees or agents shall, when presenting a plan for examination or sale to any individual or the representative of a group consisting of 25 or fewer individuals, disclose in writing the ratio of incurred claims to earned premiums (loss-ratio) for the insurer’s preceding calendar year. This section shall become operative on March 1, 1991, in order to allow insurers time to comply with its provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1071, Sec. 2.   Section operative March 1, 1991, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.

The commissioner shall, from time to time as conditions warrant, after notice and public hearing, promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations, and amendments and additions thereto, as are necessary to administer this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.

Beginning on or before January 1, 1976, each insurer shall, to the extent required by the commissioner, file with the commissioner copies of all printed advertising which the insurer proposes to disseminate in the state.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 790.025 by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1208.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Small Employer Health Insurance [10700. - 10752.8.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [10700. - 10701.]

10700.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Agent or broker” means a person or entity licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 of Division 1.

(b) “Benefit plan design” means a specific health coverage product issued by a carrier to small employers, to trustees of associations that include small employers, or to individuals if the coverage is offered through employment or sponsored by an employer. It includes services covered and the levels of copayment and deductibles, and it may include the professional providers who are to provide those services and the sites where those services are to be provided. A benefit plan design may also be an integrated system for the financing and delivery of quality health care
 services which has significant incentives for the covered individuals to use the system.

(c) “Board” means the Major Risk Medical Insurance Board.

(d) “Carrier” means any disability insurance company or any other entity that writes, issues, or administers health benefit plans that cover the employees of small employers, regardless of the situs of the contract or master policyholder. For the purposes of Articles 3 (commencing with Section 10719) and 4 (commencing with Section 10730), “carrier” also includes health care service plans.

(e) “Dependent” means the spouse or child of an eligible employee, subject to applicable terms of the health benefit plan covering the employee, and includes dependents of guaranteed association members if the association elects to include dependents under its health coverage at the same
 time it determines its membership composition pursuant to subdivision (z).

(f) “Eligible employee” means either of the following:

(1) Any permanent employee who is actively engaged on a full-time basis in the conduct of the business of the small employer with a normal workweek of at least 30 hours, in the small employer’s regular place of business, who has met any statutorily authorized applicable waiting period requirements. The term does not include sole proprietors or the spouses of those sole proprietors, partners of a partnership or the spouses of those partners, or employees who work on a part-time, temporary, or substitute basis. It includes any eligible employee, as defined in this paragraph, who obtains coverage through a guaranteed association. Employees of employers purchasing through a guaranteed association are eligible employees if they would otherwise meet the
 definition except for the number of persons employed by the employer. A permanent employee who works at least 20 hours but not more than 29 hours is an eligible employee if all four of the following apply:

(A) The employee otherwise meets the definition of an eligible employee except for the number of hours worked.

(B) The employer offers the employee health coverage under a health benefit plan.

(C) All similarly situated individuals are offered coverage under the health benefit plan.

(D) The employee shall have worked at least 20 hours per normal workweek for at least 50 percent of the weeks in the previous calendar quarter. The insurer may request any necessary information to document the hours and time period in question, including, but not limited
 to, payroll records and employee wage and tax filings.

(2) Any member of a guaranteed association as defined in subdivision (z).

(g) “Enrollee” means an eligible employee or dependent who receives health coverage through the program from a participating carrier.

(h) “Financially impaired” means, for the purposes of this chapter, a carrier that, on or after the effective date of this chapter, is not insolvent and is either:

(1) Deemed by the commissioner to be potentially unable to fulfill its contractual obligations.

(2) Placed under an order of rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(i) “Fund”
 means the California Small Group Reinsurance Fund.

(j) “Health benefit plan” means a policy or contract written or administered by a carrier that arranges or provides health care benefits for the covered eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. The term does not include accident only, credit, disability income, coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the United States government, Medicare supplement, long-term care insurance, dental, vision, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and that is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(k) “In force business” means an existing health benefit plan issued by the carrier to a small employer.

(l) “Late enrollee” means an eligible employee or dependent who has declined health coverage under a health benefit plan offered by a small employer at the time of the initial enrollment period provided under the terms of the health benefit plan and who subsequently requests enrollment in a health benefit plan of that small employer, provided that the initial enrollment period shall be a period of at least 30 days. It also means any member of an association that is a guaranteed association as well as any other person eligible to purchase through the guaranteed association when that person has failed to purchase coverage during the initial enrollment period provided under the terms of the guaranteed association’s health benefit plan and who subsequently requests enrollment in the plan, provided that the initial enrollment period shall be a period of at least 30 days. However, an eligible employee, another person eligible for coverage through a
 guaranteed association pursuant to subdivision (z), or an eligible dependent shall not be considered a late enrollee if any of the following is applicable:

(1) The individual meets all of the following requirements:

(A) He or she was covered under another employer health benefit plan, the Healthy Families Program, the Access for Infants and Mothers (AIM) Program, or the Medi-Cal program at the time the individual was eligible to enroll.

(B) He or she certified at the time of the initial enrollment that coverage under another employer health benefit plan, the Healthy Families Program, the AIM Program, or the Medi-Cal program was the reason for declining enrollment provided that, if the individual was covered under another employer health plan, the individual was given the opportunity to make the certification required
 by this subdivision and was notified that failure to do so could result in later treatment as a late enrollee.

(C) He or she has lost or will lose coverage under another employer health benefit plan as a result of termination of employment of the individual or of a person through whom the individual was covered as a dependent, change in employment status of the individual, or of a person through whom the individual was covered as a dependent, the termination of the other plan’s coverage, cessation of an employer’s contribution toward an employee or dependent’s coverage, death of the person through whom the individual was covered as a dependent, legal separation, or divorce; or he or she has lost or will lose coverage under the Healthy Families Program, the AIM Program, or the Medi-Cal program.

(D) He or she requests enrollment within 30 days after termination of coverage or
 employer contribution toward coverage provided under another employer health benefit plan, or requests enrollment within 60 days after termination of Medi-Cal program coverage, AIM Program coverage, or Healthy Families Program coverage.

(2) The individual is employed by an employer who offers multiple health benefit plans and the individual elects a different plan during an open enrollment period.

(3) A court has ordered that coverage be provided for a spouse or minor child under a covered employee’s health benefit plan.

(4) (A) In the case of an eligible employee as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), the carrier cannot produce a written statement from the employer stating that the individual or the person through whom an individual was eligible to be covered as a dependent, prior to
 declining coverage, was provided with, and signed acknowledgment of, an explicit written notice in boldface type specifying that failure to elect coverage during the initial enrollment period permits the carrier to impose, at the time of the individual’s later decision to elect coverage, an exclusion from coverage for a period of 12 months as well as a six-month preexisting condition exclusion unless the individual meets the criteria specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (3).

(B) In the case of an eligible employee who is a guaranteed association member, the plan cannot produce a written statement from the guaranteed association stating that the association sent a written notice in boldface type to all potentially eligible association members at their last known address prior to the initial enrollment period informing members that failure to elect coverage during the initial enrollment period permits the plan to impose, at the time of the
 member’s later decision to elect coverage, an exclusion from coverage for a period of 12 months as well as a six-month preexisting condition exclusion unless the member can demonstrate that he or she meets the requirements of subparagraphs (A), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1) or meets the requirements of paragraph (2) or (3).

(C) In the case of an employer or person who is not a member of an association, was eligible to purchase coverage through a guaranteed association, and did not do so, and would not be eligible to purchase guaranteed coverage unless purchased through a guaranteed association, the employer or person can demonstrate that he or she meets the requirements of subparagraphs (A), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1), or meets the requirements of paragraph (2) or (3), or that he or she recently had a change in status that would make him or her eligible and that application for coverage was made within 30 days of the change.

(5) The individual is an employee or dependent who meets the criteria described in paragraph (1) and was under a COBRA continuation provision and the coverage under that provision has been exhausted. For purposes of this section, the definition of “COBRA” set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 10116.5 shall apply.

(6) The individual is a dependent of an enrolled eligible employee who has lost or will lose his or her coverage under the Healthy Families Program, the AIM Program, or the Medi-Cal program and requests enrollment within 60 days after termination of that coverage.

(7) The individual is an eligible employee who previously declined coverage under an employer health benefit plan and who has subsequently acquired a dependent who would be eligible for coverage as a dependent of the employee through marriage,
 birth, adoption, or placement for adoption, and who enrolls for coverage under that employer health benefit plan on his or her behalf and on behalf of his or her dependent within 30 days following the date of marriage, birth, adoption, or placement for adoption, in which case the effective date of coverage shall be the first day of the month following the date the completed request for enrollment is received in the case of marriage, or the date of birth, or the date of adoption or placement for adoption, whichever applies. Notice of the special enrollment rights contained in this paragraph shall be provided by the employer to an employee at or before the time the employee is offered an opportunity to enroll in plan coverage.

(8) The individual is an eligible employee who has declined coverage for himself or herself or his or her dependents during a previous enrollment period because his or her dependents were covered by another employer health
 benefit plan at the time of the previous enrollment period. That individual may enroll himself or herself or his or her dependents for plan coverage during a special open enrollment opportunity if his or her dependents have lost or will lose coverage under that other employer health benefit plan. The special open enrollment opportunity shall be requested by the employee not more than 30 days after the date that the other health coverage is exhausted or terminated. Upon enrollment, coverage shall be effective not later than the first day of the first calendar month beginning after the date the request for enrollment is received. Notice of the special enrollment rights contained in this paragraph shall be provided by the employer to an employee at or before the time the employee is offered an opportunity to enroll in plan coverage.

(m) “New business” means a health benefit plan issued to a small employer that is not the carrier’s in force
 business.

(n) “Participating carrier” means a carrier that has entered into a contract with the program to provide health benefits coverage under this part.

(o) “Plan of operation” means the plan of operation of the fund, including articles, bylaws, and operating rules adopted by the fund pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 10719).

(p) “Program” means the Health Insurance Plan of California.

(q) “Preexisting condition provision” means a policy provision that excludes coverage for charges or expenses incurred during a specified period following the insured’s effective date of coverage, as to a condition for which medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was recommended or received during a specified period immediately preceding the
 effective date of coverage.

(r) “Creditable coverage” means:

(1) Any individual or group policy, contract, or program, that is written or administered by a disability insurer, health care service plan, fraternal benefits society, self-insured employer plan, or any other entity, in this state or elsewhere, and that arranges or provides medical, hospital, and surgical coverage not designed to supplement other private or governmental plans. The term includes continuation or conversion coverage but does not include accident only, credit, coverage for onsite medical clinics, disability income, Medicare supplement, long-term care, dental, vision, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law, automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and
 that is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(2) The federal Medicare Program pursuant to Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.).

(3) The Medicaid program pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(4) Any other publicly sponsored program, provided in this state or elsewhere, of medical, hospital, and surgical care.

(5) Chapter 55 (commencing with Section 1071) of Title 10 of the United States Code (Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS)).

(6) A medical care program of the Indian Health Service or of a tribal
 organization.

(7) A state health benefits risk pool.

(8) A health plan offered under Chapter 89 (commencing with Section 8901) of Title 5 of the United States Code (Federal Employees Health Benefits Program (FEHBP)).

(9) A public health plan as defined in federal regulations authorized by Section 2701(c)(1)(I) of the federal Public Health Service Act, as amended by Public Law 104-191, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.

(10) A health benefit plan under Section 5(e) of the federal Peace Corps Act (22 U.S.C. Sec. 2504(e)).

(11) Any other creditable coverage as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 2701 of Title XXVII of the federal Public Health Service
 Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg(c)).

(s) “Rating period” means the period for which premium rates established by a carrier are in effect and shall be no less than six months.

(t) “Risk adjusted employee risk rate” means the rate determined for an eligible employee of a small employer in a particular risk category after applying the risk adjustment factor.

(u) “Risk adjustment factor” means the percent adjustment to be applied equally to each standard employee risk rate for a particular small employer, based upon any expected deviations from standard claims. The factor may not be more than 110 percent or less than 90 percent.

(v) “Risk category” means the following characteristics of an eligible employee: age, geographic region, and family size of the
 employee, plus the benefit plan design selected by the small employer.

(1) No more than the following age categories may be used in determining premium rates:

Under 30

30–39

40–49

50–54

55–59

60–64

65 and over.

However, for the 65 years of age and over category, separate premium rates may be specified depending upon whether coverage under the health benefit plan will be primary or secondary to benefits provided by the federal Medicare Program pursuant to Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act.

(2) Small employer carriers shall base
 rates to small employers using no more than the following family size categories:

(A) Single.

(B) Married couple.

(C) One adult and child or children.

(D) Married couple and child or children.

(3) (A) In determining rates for small employers, a carrier that operates statewide shall use no more than nine geographic regions in the state, have no region smaller than an area in which the first three digits of all its ZIP Codes are in common within a county, and shall divide no county into more than two regions. Carriers shall be deemed to be operating statewide if their coverage area includes 90 percent or more of the state’s population. Geographic regions established
 pursuant to this section shall, as a group, cover the entire state, and the area encompassed in a geographic region shall be separate and distinct from areas encompassed in other geographic regions. Geographic regions may be noncontiguous.

(B) In determining rates for small employers, a carrier that does not operate statewide shall use no more than the number of geographic regions in the state than is determined by the following formula: the population, as determined in the last federal census, of all counties that are included in their entirety in a carrier’s service area divided by the total population of the state, as determined in the last federal census, multiplied by nine. The resulting number shall be rounded to the nearest whole integer. A region shall not be smaller than an area in which the first three digits of all its ZIP Codes are in common within a county and a county shall not be divided into more than two regions. The area
 encompassed in a geographic region shall be separate and distinct from areas encompassed in other geographic regions. Geographic regions may be noncontiguous. A carrier shall not have less than one geographic area.

(w) “Small employer” means either of the following:

(1) Any person, proprietary or nonprofit firm, corporation, partnership, public agency, or association that is actively engaged in business or service that, on at least 50 percent of its working days during the preceding calendar quarter, or preceding calendar year, employed at least 2, but not more than 50, eligible employees, the majority of whom were employed within this state, that was not formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance and in which a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining whether to apply the calendar quarter or calendar year test, the insurer shall use the test
 that ensures eligibility if only one test would establish eligibility. However, for purposes of subdivisions (b) and (h) of Section 10705, the definition shall include employers with at least two eligible employees. In determining the number of eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies and that are eligible to file a combined income tax return for purposes of state taxation shall be considered one employer. Subsequent to the issuance of a health benefit plan to a small employer pursuant to this chapter, and for the purpose of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided, provisions of this chapter that apply to a small employer shall continue to apply until the health benefit plan anniversary following the date the employer no longer meets the requirements of this definition. It includes any small employer as defined in this paragraph who purchases coverage through a guaranteed association, any employer
 purchasing coverage for employees through a guaranteed association, and any small employer as defined in this paragraph who purchases coverage through any arrangement, but does not include multiple employer welfare arrangements regulated pursuant to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 742.20) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 that provide health care benefits to their members on a self-funded or partially self-funded basis and that comply with small group health reforms.

(2) Any guaranteed association, as defined in subdivision (y), that purchases health coverage for members of the association.

(x) “Standard employee risk rate” means the rate applicable to an eligible employee in a particular risk category in a small employer group.

(y) “Guaranteed association” means a nonprofit organization comprised of a group
 of individuals or employers who associate based solely on participation in a specified profession or industry, accepting for membership any individual or employer meeting its membership criteria which (1) includes one or more small employers as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (w), (2) does not condition membership directly or indirectly on the health or claims history of any person, (3) uses membership dues solely for and in consideration of the membership and membership benefits, except that the amount of the dues shall not depend on whether the member applies for or purchases insurance offered by the association, (4) is organized and maintained in good faith for purposes unrelated to insurance, (5) has been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and for at least five years prior to that date, (6) has been offering health insurance to its members for at least five years prior to January 1, 1992, (7) has a constitution and bylaws, or other analogous governing documents that provide for election of
 the governing board of the association by its members, (8) offers any benefit plan design that is purchased to all individual members and employer members in this state, (9) includes any member choosing to enroll in the benefit plan design offered to the association provided that the member has agreed to make the required premium payments, and (10) covers at least 1,000 persons with the carrier with which it contracts. The requirement of 1,000 persons may be met if component chapters of a statewide association contracting separately with the same carrier cover at least 1,000 persons in the aggregate.

This subdivision applies regardless of whether a master policy by an admitted insurer is delivered directly to the association or a trust formed for or sponsored by an association to administer benefits for association members.

For purposes of this subdivision, an association formed by a merger of two or more associations after
 January 1, 1992, and otherwise meeting the criteria of this subdivision shall be deemed to have been in active existence on January 1, 1992, if its predecessor organizations had been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and for at least five years prior to that date and otherwise met the criteria of this subdivision.

(z) “Members of a guaranteed association” means any individual or employer meeting the association’s membership criteria if that person is a member of the association and chooses to purchase health coverage through the association. At the association’s discretion, it may also include employees of association members, association staff, retired members, retired employees of members, and surviving spouses and dependents of deceased members. However, if an association chooses to include those persons as members of the guaranteed association, the association must so elect in advance of purchasing coverage from a plan. Health plans
 may require an association to adhere to the membership composition it selects for up to 12 months.

(aa) “Affiliation period” means a period that, under the terms of the health benefit plan, shall elapse before health care services under the plan become effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 700, Sec. 7.   (SB 1375)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10701.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “health benefit plan” does not include policies or certificates of specified disease or hospital confinement indemnity provided that the carrier offering those policies or certificates complies with the following:

(1) The carrier files, on or before March 1 of each year, a certification with the commissioner that contains the statement and information described in paragraph (2).

(2) The certification required in paragraph (1) shall contain the following:

(A) A statement from the carrier certifying that policies or certificates described in this section (i) are being offered and marketed as supplemental health insurance and not as a substitute for hospital or medical expense insurance, health care service plans, or major medical expense insurance, (ii) the disclosure forms as described in Section 10603 contains the following statement prominently on the first page: “This is a supplement to health insurance. It is not a substitute for hospital or medical expense insurance, a health maintenance organization (HMO) contract, or major medical expense insurance,” and (iii) are not being offered, marketed, or sold in a manner that would make the purchase of the policies contingent upon the sale of any product sold under Sections 10700 and 10718, or under Section 1357 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A summary description of each policy or certificate described in this section, including the average annual premium rates, or range of premium rates in cases where premiums vary by age, gender, or other factors, charged for the policies and certificates in this state.

(3) In the case of a policy or certificate that is described in this section and that is offered for the first time in this state on or after January 1, 1997, the carrier files with the commissioner the information and statement required in paragraph (2) at least 30 days prior to the date such a policy or certificate is issued or delivered in this state.

(b) As used in this section, “policies or certificates of specified disease” and “policies or certificates of hospital confinement indemnity” mean policies or certificates of insurance sold to an insured to supplement other health insurance coverage as specified in this section. An insurer issuing a “policy or certificate of specified disease” or a “policy or certificate of hospital confinement indemnity” shall require that the person to be insured is covered by an individual or group policy or contract that arranges or provides medical, hospital, and surgical coverage not designed to supplement other private or governmental plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 544, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Small Employer Carrier Requirements [10702. - 10718.7.]

10702.

All carriers writing, issuing, or administering health benefit plans that cover employees of small employers shall be subject to this chapter if any one of the following conditions are met:

(a) Any portion of the premium for any health benefit plan or benefits is paid by a small employer, or any covered individual is reimbursed, whether through wage adjustments or otherwise, by a small employer for any portion of the premium.

(b) The health benefit plan is treated by the small employer or any of the covered individuals as part of a plan or program for the purposes of Section 106 or 162 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10702.1.

Any person or entity subject to the requirements of this chapter shall comply with the standards set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3750) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Family Code and Section 14124.94 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1062, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10703.

The commissioner shall have the authority to determine whether a health benefit plan is covered by this chapter, and to determine whether an employer is a small employer within the meaning of Section 10700.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10704.

The commissioner may issue regulations that are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Prior to the public comment period required on the regulations under the Administrative Procedure Act, the commissioner shall provide the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care with a copy of the proposed regulations. The Director of the Department of Managed Health Care shall have 30 days to notify the commissioner in writing of any comments on the regulations. The Director of the Department of Managed Health Care’s comments shall be included in the public notice issued on the regulations. Any rules and regulations issued pursuant to this subdivision may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Until December 31, 1994, the adoption of these regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The regulations shall be enforced by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10705.

Upon the effective date of this act:

(a) No group or individual policy or contract or certificate of group insurance or statement of group coverage providing benefits to employees of small employers as defined in this chapter shall be issued or delivered by a carrier subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner regardless of the situs of the contract or master policyholder or of the domicile of the carrier nor, except as otherwise provided in Sections 10270.91 and 10270.92, shall a carrier provide coverage subject to this chapter until a copy of the form of the policy, contract, certificate, or statement of coverage is filed with and approved by the commissioner in accordance with Sections 10290 and
 10291, and the carrier has complied with the requirements of Section 10717.

(b) (1) Each carrier, except a self-funded employer, shall fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell all of the carrier’s benefit plan designs that are sold to, offered through, or sponsored by, small employers or associations that include small employers to all small employers in each geographic region in which the carrier makes coverage available or provides benefits.

(2) A carrier contracting to participate in the Voluntary Alliance Uniting Employers Purchasing Program shall be deemed to be in compliance with paragraph (1) for a benefit plan design offered through the program in those geographic regions in which the carrier participates in the program and the benefit plan design is offered exclusively through the program.

(3) (A) A carrier shall be deemed to meet the requirements of paragraph (1) and subdivision (c) with respect to a benefit plan design that qualifies as a grandfathered health plan under Section 1251 of PPACA if all of the following requirements are met:

(i) The carrier offers to renew the benefit plan design, unless the carrier withdraws the benefit plan design from the small employer market pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 10713.

(ii) The carrier provides appropriate notice of the grandfathered status of the benefit plan design in any materials provided to an insured of the design describing the benefits provided under the design, as required under PPACA.

(iii) The carrier makes no changes to the benefits covered under the benefit plan design other than those required by a
 state or federal law, regulation, rule, or guidance and those permitted to be made to a grandfathered health plan under PPACA.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued thereunder. For purposes of this paragraph, a “grandfathered health plan” shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an association, or a trust established and maintained by an association to receive a master insurance policy issued by an admitted insurer and to administer the benefits thereof solely for association members, to offer, market or sell a benefit plan design to those who are not members of the
 association. However, if the association markets, offers or sells a benefit plan design to those who are not members of the association it is subject to the requirements of this section. This shall apply to an association that otherwise meets the requirements of paragraph (8) formed by merger of two or more associations after January 1, 1992, if the predecessor organizations had been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and for at least five years prior to that date and met the requirements of paragraph (5).

(5) A carrier which (A) effective January 1, 1992, and at least 20 years prior to that date, markets, offers, or sells benefit plan designs only to all members of one association and (B) does not market, offer or sell any other individual, selected group, or group policy or contract providing medical, hospital and surgical benefits shall not be required to market, offer, or sell to those who are not members of the association. However,
 if the carrier markets, offers or sells any benefit plan design or any other individual, selected group, or group policy or contract providing medical, hospital and surgical benefits to those who are not members of the association it is subject to the requirements of this section.

(6) Each carrier that sells health benefit plans to members of one association pursuant to paragraph (5) shall submit an annual statement to the commissioner which states that the carrier is selling health benefit plans pursuant to paragraph (5) and which, for the one association, lists all the information required by paragraph (7).

(7) Each carrier that sells health benefit plans to members of any association shall submit an annual statement to the commissioner which lists each association to which the carrier sells health benefit plans, the industry or profession which is served by the association, the
 association’s membership criteria, a list of officers, the state in which the association is organized, and the site of its principal office.

(8) For purposes of paragraphs (4) and (5), an association is a nonprofit organization comprised of a group of individuals or employers who associate based solely on participation in a specified profession or industry, accepting for membership any individual or small employer meeting its membership criteria, which do not condition membership directly or indirectly on the health or claims history of any person, which uses membership dues solely for and in consideration of the membership and membership benefits, except that the amount of the dues shall not depend on whether the member applies for or purchases insurance offered by the association, which is organized and maintained in good faith for purposes unrelated to insurance, which has been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and at least five years